Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 3 Liens Against Causes of Action

9-3-1.
Attorney’s lien — Creation.

Whenever the relationship of attorney and client has been entered into by an implied or express contract for service, wherein the attorney does not agree to be responsible for costs of suit, the attorney shall have a lien to the value of his or her contractual interests in the cause of action, claim, demand, counterclaim, or other matter concerning which the contract is entered into.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1515, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 301, § 32; P.L. 1931, ch. 1761, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 450, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-3-1

.

9-3-2.
Operation of attorney’s lien.

From the time notice is given by an attorney of the relationship of attorney and client to the person or party against whom a claim, demand, or counterclaim is made, or a cause of action or other matter is pending, the attorney’s implied or express agreement shall begin to operate as a lien, and no settlement either before or after judgment shall invalidate it, but it may be enforced like any other lien against the money or thing of value which is the consideration for the settlement, or the parties, if they have made a settlement, may be proceeded against jointly or severally in an action on the case at law and shall be jointly or severally liable to the attorney for the full value of his or her lien in accordance with his or her implied or express agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1515, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 301, § 32; P.L. 1931, ch. 1761, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 450, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-3-2

.

9-3-3.
Enforcement of attorney’s lien.

Any lien created by the provisions of §§

9-3-1

and

9-3-2

may, at the election of the attorney, be established, foreclosed, and enforced by a civil action, which action may be tried and determined according to the usages in chancery and the principles of equity.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 301, § 32, as enacted by P.L. 1931, ch. 1761, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 450, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-3-3

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 10.

9-3-4.
Hospital lien on claim for personal injuries.

Every association, corporation, or other institution, including a municipal corporation, maintaining a hospital in the state, which shall furnish medical or other service to any patient injured by reason of an accident not covered by the workers’ compensation act, shall, if the injured party shall assert or maintain a claim against another for damages on account of the injuries, have a lien upon that part going or belonging to the patient, of any recovery or sum had or collected or to be collected by the patient, or by his or her heirs or personal representatives in the case of his or her death, whether by judgment or by settlement or compromise, to the amount of the reasonable and necessary charges of the hospital up to the date of payment of the damages; provided, however, that the lien herein set forth shall not be applied or considered valid against anyone coming under the workers’ compensation act in this state; and, provided, further, that nothing herein enacted shall be so construed as to give the lien herein created precedence over the lien of an attorney.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 708, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-3-4

.

9-3-5.
Notice of hospital lien.

No hospital lien shall be effective unless a written notice containing the name and address of the injured person, the date of the accident, the name and location of the hospital, and the name of the person or persons, firm or firms, corporation or corporations alleged to be liable to the injured party for the injuries received shall be filed in the office of the city or town clerk in which the hospital is located, prior to the payment of any money to the injured person, his or her attorneys, or legal representatives as compensation for the injuries; nor unless the hospital shall also mail, postage prepaid, a copy of the notice with a statement of the date of filing thereof to the injured person and to the person or persons, firm or firms, corporation or corporations alleged to be liable to the injured party for the injuries sustained prior to the payment of any money to the injured person, his or her attorneys, or legal representative as compensation for the injuries. The hospital shall mail a copy of the notice to any insurance carrier which has insured the person, firm, or corporation against such liability.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 708, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-3-5

.

9-3-6.
Liability for payments to patient without honoring hospital lien.

Any person or persons, firm or firms, corporation or corporations, making any payment to a hospital patient or to his or her attorneys or heirs or legal representatives as compensation for the injury sustained, after the filing and mailing of the notice provided in §

9-3-5

, without paying to the hospital the amount of its lien or so much thereof as can be satisfied out of the money due under any final judgment or compromise or settlement agreement after paying the amount of any prior liens, shall, for a period of one year from the date of payment to the patient or his or her heirs, attorneys, or legal representatives, be and remain liable to the hospital for the amount which the hospital was entitled to receive; and any such association, corporation, or other institution maintaining the hospital may, within such period, enforce its lien by a suit at law against the person or persons, firm or firms, corporation or corporations, making any such payment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 708, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

9-3-6

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 16.

9-3-7.
Examination of hospital records.

Any person or persons, firm or firms, corporation or corporations legally liable for a hospital lien or against whom a claim shall be asserted for compensation for injuries, shall be permitted to examine the records of any such association or other institution or body maintaining the hospital in reference to the treatment, care, and maintenance of the injured person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 708, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

9-3-7

.

9-3-8.
Hospital lien docket.

Every city or town clerk shall, at the expense of the city or town, provide a suitable well bound book to be called the hospital lien docket in which, upon the filing of any lien claim under the provisions of §§

9-3-4

—

9-3-7

, he or she shall enter the name of the injured person, the name of the person, firm, or corporation alleged to be liable for the injuries, the name of an insurance carrier where it is known at the time of filing of the notice, the date of the accident, and the name of the hospital or other institution making the claim, and the clerk shall index the lien in the name of the injured person and the hospital and in the name of the insurance carrier where the name of the carrier is known at the time of filing the notice.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 708, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

9-3-8

.

9-3-9.
Motor vehicle repairer’s lien.

Every motor vehicle repairer who shall furnish material and labor, or either, in the repair of a motor vehicle shall, if the owner of the vehicle has insured the automobile against damage or loss by collision, have a lien upon any payment due the owner of the vehicle, his or her representative, or assignee, on account of the insurance, to the amount of the reasonable and necessary charges of the repairer up to the date of payment of the amount; provided, however, that nothing herein contained shall be construed to give the lien herein created precedence over the lien of an attorney.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 40, § 1.

9-3-10.
Notice of repairer’s lien.

The lien provided in §

9-3-9

shall be effective only if a written notice containing the name and address of the owner, the date of the accident, and the name and address of the repairer shall be mailed, postage prepaid, to the insurance carrier insuring against damage or loss by collision prior to the payment of any money to the owner, his or her representative, or assignee in compensation for the damage or loss.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 40, § 1.

9-3-11.
Liability where lien is not honored.

Any insurance carrier making any payment to the owner, his or her representative, or assignee as compensation for the repair of damage to the vehicle after the mailing of the notice without paying to the repairer the amount of his or her lien or so much thereof as can be satisfied out of the money due under any final judgment or compromise or settlement agreement after paying the amount of any prior liens, shall, for a period of one year from the date of payment to the owner, his or her representative, or assignee, be and remain liable to the repairer for the amount which the repairer was entitled to receive; and any such repairer may, within such period, enforce his or her lien by a suit at law against the insurance carrier making the payment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 40, § 1.

9-3-12.
Motor vehicle lessor’s lien.

Every person, firm, or corporation licensed pursuant to §

31-5-33

, who shall rent a vehicle to a lessee as a substitute vehicle for one owned by the lessee and the vehicle owned by the lessee is insured against transportation expenses, shall have a lien upon any payment due the owner of the vehicle, his or her representative, or assignee for transportation expenses and on account of the insurance, to the amount of the reasonable and necessary charges of the rental up to the date of payment of the amount; provided, however, that nothing herein contained shall be construed to give the lien herein created precedence over the lien of an attorney.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 211, § 1.

9-3-13.
Notice of lessor’s lien.

The lien provided in §

9-3-12

shall be effective only if a written notice containing the name and address of the owner, the date of the accident, and the name and address of the lessor shall be mailed, postage prepaid, to the insurance carrier insuring against the loss prior to the payment of any money to the owner, his or her representative, or assignee in compensation for the damage or loss.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 211, § 1.

9-3-14.
Liability where lien is not honored.

Any insurance carrier making any payment to the owner, his or her representative, or assignee as compensation for the particular loss after the mailing of the notice without paying to the lessor the amount of his or her lien or so much thereof as can be satisfied out of the money due under any final judgment or compromise or settlement agreement after paying the amount of any prior liens, shall, for a period of one year from the date of payment to the owner, his or her representative, or assignee, be and remain liable to the lessor for the amount which the lessor was entitled to receive; and any such lessor may, within such period, enforce his or her lien by a civil action against the insurance carrier making the payment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 211, § 1.